Tennessee statutes. Title 59 Mines And Mining
Part 4

Coal Surface Mining Act of 1987

59-8-401. Short title.

This part shall be known and cited as the “Coal Surface Mining Act of 1987.”

Acts 1987, ch. 251, § 1.

59-8-402. Legislative findings and intent.

The purpose of this part is to establish a regulatory program which will allow coal surface mining as defined herein for operations which are exempt from the jurisdiction of the federal Surface Mining Control and Reclamation Act of 1977 (30 U.S.C. § 1201 et seq.) consistent with adequate environmental safeguards; except this part is not intended to regulate coal surface mining operations where less than twenty-five (25) tons of coal are removed within twelve (12) successive calendar months in any one (1) location regardless of the size of the area affected.

The general assembly finds that although the surface mining of coal on operations disturbing two (2) surface acres or less within this state provides a significant present source of energy and employment, the proper control of surface mining of coal, so as to minimize or prevent adverse disruptions and the injurious effects thereof, requires thorough planning in selection of appropriate coal surface mining sites, methods of coal surface mining and the nature and extent of reclamation; consideration of the impact of coal surface mining upon the ecology and land use of surrounding areas as well as upon the disturbed land of the coal surface mining site; and the incorporation and use of control techniques and reclamation actions as an integral and simultaneous part of coal surface mining.

To the extent that the federal government defines or redefines its jurisdiction over coal surface mining operations within the scope of this part, it is the intention of the general assembly that the program substantially comply with the federal definitions.

Acts 1987, ch. 251, § 6.

59-8-403. Part definitions. [See contingent amendment to subdivision (2) and Compiler’s Notes.]

As used in this part, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Affected area” means any land or water surface area which is used to facilitate, or is physically altered by, coal surface mining and reclamation operations. The affected area includes the disturbed area; any area upon which coal surface mining and reclamation operations are conducted; any adjacent lands, the use of which is incidental to coal surface mining and reclamation operations; all areas covered by new or existing roads used to gain access to, or for hauling coal to or from, coal surface mining and reclamation operations, except as provided in this definition; any area covered by surface excavations, workings, impoundments, dams, ventilation shafts, entryways, refuse banks, dumps, stockpiles, overburden piles, spoil banks, culm banks, tailings, holes or depressions, repair areas, storage areas, shipping areas; any areas upon which are sited structures, facilities, or other property; material on the surface resulting from, or incident to, coal surface mining and reclamation operations; and the area located above underground workings. The affected area includes every road used for purposes of access to, or for hauling coal to or from, coal surface mining and reclamation operations, unless the road:

Was designated as a public road pursuant to the laws of the jurisdiction in which it is located;

Is maintained with public funds, and constructed in a manner similar to other public roads of the same classification within the jurisdiction; and

There is substantial (more than incidental) public use;

[Current version. See second version for contingent amendment and Compiler's Notes.]

“Board” means the Tennessee board of water quality, oil, and gas [See the Compiler's Notes] as established pursuant to [former] § 59-8-321 [repealed. See the Compiler's Notes];

[Contingent amendment. See the Compiler's Notes.]

“Coal surface mining and reclamation operations” means surface mining operations and all activities necessary and incidental to the reclamation of such operations;

“Coal surface mining operations” means:

Activities conducted on the surface of lands in connection with a coal surface mine. Such activities include excavation for the purpose of obtaining coal, including such common methods as contour, strip, auger, mountaintop removal, box cut, open pit, and area mining, the uses of explosives and blasting, and loading of coal at or near the mine site; provided, however, that such activities do not include the extraction of coal incidental to the extraction of other minerals where coal does not exceed sixteen and two-thirds percent (162/3%) of the tonnage of minerals removed for purposes of commercial use or sale; and

The areas upon which such activities occur or where such activities disturb the natural land surface. Such areas also include any adjacent land, the use of which is incidental to any such activities, all lands affected by the construction of new roads or the improvement or use of existing roads to gain access to the site of such activities for haulage and excavations, workings, impoundments, dams, ventilation shafts, entryways, refuse banks, dumps, stockpiles, overburden piles, spoil banks, culm banks, tailings, holes or depressions, repair areas, storage areas, processing areas, shipping areas, and other areas upon which are sited structures, facilities, or other property or materials on the surface, resulting from or incidental to such activities;

“Commissioner” means the commissioner of environment and conservation, the commissioner of environment and conservation's duly authorized representative, and in the event of absence or a vacancy in the office of commissioner, the deputy commissioner;

“Director” means the director of the division of water pollution control in the department of environment and conservation;

“Imminent danger to the health and safety of the public” means the existence of any condition or practice, or any violation of a permit or any other requirement of this part, in a coal surface mining and reclamation operation which condition, practice, or violation could reasonably be expected to cause substantial physical harm to persons outside the permit area before such condition, practice or violation can be abated. A reasonable expectation of death or serious injury before abatement exists if a rational person, subjected to the same conditions or practices giving rise to the peril, would not personally expose oneself to the danger during the time necessary for abatement;

“Lignite coal” means consolidated lignitic coal having less than eight thousand three hundred British thermal units (8,300 BTUs) per pound, moisture and mineral matter free;

“Operator” means any person, partnership or corporation engaged in mining coal from the earth who removes or intends to remove more than twenty-five (25) tons of coal from the earth by surface mining or who removes overburden for the purpose of removing coal within twelve (12) successive calendar months in any one (1) location;

“Permit” means a permit to conduct coal surface mining and reclamation operations issued by the commissioner pursuant to this part;

“Permit applicant” or “applicant” means a person applying for a permit;

“Permit area” means the area of land indicated on the approved map submitted by the operator with the operator's application, which area of land shall be covered by the operator's bond as required by this part and shall be readily identifiable by appropriate markers on the site;

“Permittee” means a person holding a permit;

“Person” means an individual, partnership, association, society, governmental agency or entity, joint stock company, firm, company, corporation, or other business organization. The board, department, and their officials and employees acting in their official capacity are not to be considered “persons” pursuant to this part;

“Reclamation plan” means a plan submitted by an applicant for a permit under this part which sets forth a plan for reclamation of the proposed coal surface mining operations pursuant to this part;

“Secretary” means the secretary of the interior; and

“Wildcat miner” means a person violating this part by willfully and knowingly extracting coal without a valid permit, or from an area not covered by a valid permit.

“Board” means the Tennessee “board of energy and natural resources, created by §69-3-104;

Acts 1987, ch. 251, § 7; 1992, ch. 693, § 1; 2018, ch. 839, § 7.

Compiler's Notes. Former §59-8-321, referred to in this section, concerning the board of reclamation review, was repealed by Acts 1991, ch. 117, § 2(b). The duties of the former board of reclamation review were transferred to the former water quality control board created by §69-3-104, by Acts 1991, ch. 117, § 4. The former water quality control board, created by § 69-3-104, was terminated by Acts 2012, ch. 986, § 26, and its responsibilities were transferred to the Tennessee board of water quality, oil, and gas, created by § 69-3-104.

Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 44 provided that the governor shall take all action necessary to prepare and submit for approval all necessary requests for federal grant funding and applications for authorization to the appropriate federal authority to obtain exclusive jurisdiction over surface coal mining and reclamation operations and the maximum federal money available for those purposes in an expeditious manner.

Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 45 provided that the commissioner of environment and conservation shall notify the secretary of state and the executive secretary of the Tennessee code commission of the date this state has been approved to exercise primacy over the regulation of surface coal mining and reclamation operations within its territorial boundaries.

Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 47 provided that the act, which amended this section, shall take effect, including for purposes of rulemaking, upon the deposit of federal funds in the Coal Mining Protection Fund.

Amendments. The 2018 amendment rewrote the definition of “board” by substituting “board of energy and natural resources, created by §69-3-104” for “board of water quality, oil, and gas as established pursuant to former § 59-8-321”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 47. [See Compiler's Notes.]

Cross-References. Controlling interest defined, §59-8-406.

59-8-404. Commissioner's powers generally.

In addition to the specific powers and authority granted elsewhere in this chapter, the commissioner shall have the following authority and powers to:

Administer and enforce this part and its regulations, permits and orders authorized and promulgated pursuant thereto;

Conduct and obtain investigations, research, experiments, training programs and demonstrations, and to collect and disseminate information relating to exploration, surface mining, reclamation of disturbed lands, and control of pollution of water and soil affected by exploration and surface mining for coal;

Promulgate regulations in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, part 2;

Issue notices of noncompliance, cease orders, or other orders in the office or on-site, as are authorized by this part requiring the adoption by an operator of remedial measures necessary for carrying out this part or regulations, or permits, issued pursuant to this part;

Examine, and approve, modify, or disapprove, applications for permits, maps, bonds, mining and reclamation plans submitted by operators;

Establish by regulation standards for acceptable mining and reclamation of affected areas, which shall be designed to achieve soil stabilization, control soil erosion, obliterate the scars of the mining operation, ensure quick revegetation, and ensure that the operation meets applicable soil and water quality standards;

Make such investigations or inspections as are necessary to insure compliance with this part, including the right to enter at any time upon a suspected or affected area for such purposes and the right of ingress and egress across intervening properties;

Employ and commission qualified persons as surface mine personnel. When properly qualified and commissioned, such personnel shall be vested with such authority as is necessary to enforce all laws, regulations, and permits administered by the department, including the issuance of service of process, and shall have the right to carry firearms or other arms while on duty;

Enter into contracts or other agreements for reclamation of sites pursuant to this chapter, or to otherwise further the purposes of this part;

Expend or cause to be expended money from the surface mining reclamation fund for purposes of this chapter; and

Establish a process whereby a single set of forms and information may be submitted in multiple copies to the division of water pollution control, containing sufficient mutually needed information to serve as a basic application for such agencies, so that evaluation of applications shall be made cooperatively, and decisions to grant or deny these permits shall be made simultaneously.

Acts 1987, ch. 251, § 8.

59-8-405. Emergency authority.

The commissioner is authorized to expend moneys from the Tennessee surface mine reclamation fund for the emergency restoration, reclamation, abatement, control, or prevention of adverse effects of coal mining practices, on eligible lands, if the commissioner finds that:

An emergency exists constituting a danger to the public health, safety, or general welfare; and

No other person or agency will act expeditiously to restore, reclaim, abate, control, or prevent the adverse effect of coal mining practices.

The commissioner, commissioner's agents, employees, and contractors, shall have the right to enter upon any land where the emergency exists, and any other land, to have access to the land where the emergency exists to restore, reclaim, abate, control, or prevent the adverse effects of coal mining practices, and to do all things necessary or expedient to protect the public health, safety, or general welfare.

Such entry shall be construed as an exercise of the police power, and shall not be construed as an act of condemnation of property nor of trespass thereon.

The money expended for such work and the benefits accruing to any such land shall mitigate or offset any claim in or any action brought by any owner of any interest in such premises for alleged damages by virtue of such entry; provided, however, that this subdivision (b)(3) is not intended to create new rights of action or eliminate existing immunities.

Acts 1987, ch. 251, § 9.

Cross-References. Surface mine reclamation fund, §59-8-303.

59-8-406. Permits generally.

No operator shall engage in coal surface mining operations which affect two (2) acres or less without having first obtained from the commissioner a permit for the surface mining operation.

All permits issued pursuant to the requirements of this part shall be issued for a term not to exceed one (1) year.

Such permits shall be granted by the commissioner only if the requirements and criteria set forth in this part and any regulations pertaining to those requirements are satisfied; and only upon the submission by the operator and approval by the commissioner of a bond and permit fee for all acres permitted, a mining and reclamation plan, and other information as provided in this part and regulations issued pursuant to this part.

The permit shall authorize the operator to conduct coal surface mining operations on the area described in the application and approved plan; provided, that mining, regrading, and initial seeding are completed within one (1) year of permit issuance.

The issuance of permits shall be subject to the payment of the fee and the posting of the performance bond as prescribed in this part and submission of such information necessary to assure compliance with this part as prescribed by regulations of the commissioner.

The issuance of a permit shall be subject to the submission of a copy of the written determination made by the United States office of surface mining, pursuant to 30 CFR 700.11(c) that the proposed operation is exempt from the federal Surface Mining Control and Reclamation Act of 1977 (30 U.S.C. § 1201 et seq.), as amended.

Information pertaining to coal seams, test borings, core samplings or soil samples required by this section shall be made available to any person with an interest which is or may be adversely affected; provided, that information which pertains only to the analysis of the chemical and physical properties of the coal (excepting information regarding any mineral or elemental content which is potentially toxic in the environment) shall be kept confidential and not made a matter of public record.

Each applicant for a coal surface mining permit shall submit to the commissioner, as part of the permit application, a reclamation plan which shall meet the requirements of this part.

Each applicant for a coal surface mining permit shall file a copy of the complete application for public inspection with the registrar of deeds at the courthouse of the county, or an appropriate public office approved by the commissioner, where the mining is proposed to occur, except for that information referred to in subsection (d) as confidential. The application shall be filed for public review within five (5) days of application submittal to the commissioner.

Each applicant for a coal surface mining permit shall submit as part of the permit application, a certificate issued by an insurance company authorized to do business in this state, certifying that the applicant has a public liability insurance policy in force for the surface mining and reclamation operation for which such permit is sought, or evidence that the applicant has satisfied other state or federal self-insurance requirements.

Such policy shall provide for personal injury and property damage protection in an amount adequate to compensate any persons damaged as a result of surface mining and reclamation operations, including the use of explosives, and entitled to compensation under the applicable state law.

Such policy shall be maintained in full force and effect during the term of the permit including the length of all reclamation operations.

The commissioner may by rule or regulation set criteria for obtaining a permit exemption for the following:

Extraction of coal as an incidental part of a federal, state or local government financed highway or other construction; or

Construction operations involving less than one (1) acre in disturbance where coal removal is incidental to the purpose of the construction and not inconsistent with the purposes of this part.

An on-the-ground inspection of the proposed affected area shall be made by the commissioner before a new permit is issued.

The applicant shall submit the applicant's name, permanent address, and an address which will be used in connection with the operation covered by the permit and telephone number. The applicant shall also identify the operator and any subcontractors which will be used in connection with the operation and provide their names, permanent addresses, and telephone numbers.

Where a corporation is identified either as an applicant, operator, or subcontractor, the applicant must also submit a certified copy of the corporate charter, a list of the board of directors and officers of the corporation and identify any person who has a controlling interest in the corporation.

Where a partnership, sole proprietorship or other business enterprise is identified either as an applicant, operator, or subcontractor, the applicant shall submit the names and addresses of all partners or other persons with a controlling interest in the business venture.

For purposes of this part, “controlling interest” means ownership of ten percent (10%) or more of the voting shares of, or general partnership in, an entity; any relationship which gives one (1) person the ability in fact or law to direct what the other does, or any relationship which gives one (1) person express or implied authority to determine the manner in which coal at different sites will be mined, handled, sold or disposed of.

The applicant shall also identify any members of the applicant's same family and their relatives who have been issued a permit pursuant to this part.

The commissioner shall require all permittees to keep such records and make such reports as the commissioner may require by rule.

The authorized representatives of the commissioner, without advance notice or a search warrant, and upon presentation of appropriate credentials:

Shall have the right of entry to, upon, or through any coal surface mining and reclamation operation or any premises in which any records required to be maintained are located; and

May at reasonable times, and without delay, have access to and copy any records, and inspect any monitoring equipment or method of operation required under this part.

A permit shall not be issued to an applicant who has been issued another permit previously, unless and until the requirements for partial bond release have been met. No person who has forfeited a bond under this part prior to meeting requirements for partial bond release shall be issued a permit. No permit shall be issued to an applicant who identifies an operator or subcontractor pursuant to subsection (j) who has forfeited a bond under this part prior to meeting requirements for partial bond release.

Acts 1987, ch. 251, § 10.

Cross-References. Confidentiality of public records, §10-7-504.

Permit application fees, §59-8-418.

59-8-407. Mining and reclamation plans.

Each permit application shall include a mining and reclamation plan which shall contain such information as the commissioner, by regulation, requires as necessary to demonstrate that reclamation required by this part can be accomplished.

The mining and reclamation plan may be changed with the commissioner's approval at any time upon application of the operator, to take account of changes in conditions or to correct any previous oversight. The commissioner may also order a change in the reclamation plan for the same reasons.

Any revision which proposes significant alteration to the mining or reclamation plan shall be subject to the same notice and public hearing requirements as an application for a permit. The commissioner shall promulgate rules and regulations specifying what constitutes such significant alteration.

The plans shall be kept current and shall be carried out concurrently with the surface mining operation.

Any backfilling, grading, shaping, topsoiling, and cover crop sowing, if necessary, shall be completed within ninety (90) days after completion of the removal of the coal from a particular pit, area, or acre as identified in the mining and reclamation plan.

All of the site preparation and revegetative work shall be carried out within such time as permitted by the commissioner's regulations, which shall not be more than the first seeding or planting season after conclusion of the backfilling, grading and reshaping.

Any waiver from the above schedule must be in writing from the commissioner.

Each operator shall file a completion report within thirty (30) days after initial seeding and annually thereafter, showing those portions of the affected area for which reclamation, in accordance with the approved plan has been completed until final bond release.

The commissioner shall inspect such areas and shall notify the operator whether the reclamation is accepted as being in accordance with the approved plan, or whether there are deficiencies which must be corrected.

In addition to the requirements specified in subsection (a), the mining and reclamation plan submitted by the operator in connection with the operator's application for a permit shall include a detailed topographic map, prepared by a registered engineer, or a registered land surveyor, on a United States geological survey map, or aerial photograph, or equivalent, as may be approved by the commissioner, and on such scale as the commissioner shall require by regulation showing:

The area of land affected, the location of the stream or streams or any standing body of water into which the area drains, the location of drainways and the planned siltation traps and other drainage controls and the location of haul or other access roads to be prepared or used by the operator in the mining operation;

The location of any buildings, cemeteries, public highways, railroad tracks, gas and oil wells, publicly owned lands, officially designated scenic areas, utility lines, underground mines, transmission lines or pipe lines within the affected area or within five hundred feet (500') thereof;

The approximate location of the cuts or excavations to be made in the surface and the estimated location and height of spoil banks, and the total number of acres involved in the area of land affected; and

The date the map was prepared, together with a certification as to its accuracy by the person responsible for its preparation.

The surface mining application will be accompanied by a detailed mining plan showing:

The depth and character of overburden;

The thickness of the coal being mined;

Method of mining;

Mine waste disposal areas;

The manner, timing and distance for backfilling, grading work;

Final mine waste disposal areas and final shape of stable slope; and

A reclamation plan for haul roads that are to be left, which proposals shall meet the provisions of this section and all rules and regulations adopted pursuant thereto by the commissioner.

The application shall assure that all reshaping will be completed within such time as permitted by the commissioner's regulations, which shall not be more than three (3) months after completion of the removal of the coal being mined.

Acts 1987, ch. 251, § 11.

Cross-References. Release of bond, §59-8-414.

59-8-408. Bond requirements.

When an application is submitted, the applicant shall file with the commissioner, on a form prescribed and furnished by the commissioner, a bond payable to the state of Tennessee, in penal sum, and conditioned on the faithful performance of the provisions of the applicant's permit.

The bond shall cover that area of land within the permit area upon which the operator will initiate and conduct coal surface mining and reclamation operations.

The bond shall be executed by the operator and a corporate surety who is approved by the commissioner and properly authorized to act as such surety and licensed to do business in this state; provided, however, that the operator may elect to deposit cash or negotiable certificates of deposit assigned irrevocably to the state, or negotiable United States treasury bonds or negotiable general obligation municipal or corporate bonds, which municipal or corporate bonds have the highest rating by Moody's and/or Standard and Poor's rating services, with the treasurer of this state in lieu of a corporate surety.

The treasurer shall receive and hold such deposits in the name of the state of Tennessee, in trust, for the purposes for which such deposit is made, and shall at all times be responsible for the custody and safekeeping of such deposits.

The operator making the deposit shall be entitled from time to time to demand and receive from the treasurer, on the written order of the commissioner, the whole or any portion of any securities so deposited, upon depositing with the treasurer, in lieu thereof, other negotiable securities of the classes herein specified having a market value at least equal to the sum of the bond, and also to demand and recover the interest income from the securities as the same becomes due and payable; provided, however, that the treasurer, at the request of the operator, shall convert such securities into such other negotiable securities of the classes herein specified as may be designated by the operator.

The amount of bond or cash deposit or marketable value of the securities shall be ten thousand dollars ($10,000). Liability under each bond shall be continuous until the reclamation provisions of this part and regulations have been fulfilled.

Local governmental entities and state agencies may execute their own bonds as surety.

Acts 1987, ch. 251, § 12.

59-8-409. Action on permit applications.

Upon the basis of a complete mining application and reclamation plan as required, including public notification and the opportunity for public comment and a public hearing, the commissioner shall grant, require modification of, or deny the application for a permit in not less than thirty (30) days nor more than sixty (60) days, and notify the applicant in writing. The applicant for a permit shall have the burden of establishing that the application is in compliance with all the requirements of the program.

Acts 1987, ch. 251, § 13.

59-8-410. Permit approval — Required findings.

No permit application shall be approved unless the applicant affirmatively demonstrates, and the commissioner finds in writing, on the basis of the information set forth in the application or from information otherwise available which will be documented in the approval and made available to the applicant, that:

The permit application is accurate and complete and that the applicant has complied with all the requirements of this part and any regulations issued pursuant to this part;

The applicant has demonstrated that reclamation as required by this part and any regulations issued pursuant to this part can be accomplished under the reclamation plan contained in the permit application;

No part of the operation would constitute a hazard to a dwelling house, public building, school, church, cemetery, commercial or institutional building, public road, stream, lake, reservoir, water wells, officially designated scenic areas or other private or public property;

The area proposed to be mined for coal is not included within an area designated unsuitable for coal surface mining pursuant to the federal Surface Mining Control and Reclamation Act of 1977 (30 U.S.C. § 1201 et seq.), or is not within an area under study for such designation in an administrative proceeding commenced pursuant to such law (unless the operator demonstrates that prior to January 1, 1977, the applicant has made substantial legal and financial commitments in relation to a mining operation for which he is applying for a permit);

The owner or owners of the coal to be mined are identified;

The source of the operator's legal right to enter and mine the coal on the land affected by the permit and whether that right is the subject of pending court litigation are identified;

There is evidence of the operator's legal right to surface mine the minerals on the land affected by the permit. If the surface estate has been severed from the mineral estate, such evidence may be provided by either:

A deed, lease, or other document which severs the mineral rights and expressly permits the removal of minerals by surface mining or a certified extract of the appropriate provisions of such documents; or

A deed, lease or conveyance which severs the mineral rights without specific provisions for surface mining and an accompanying affidavit by the current surface estate owner agreeing to the removal of such minerals by surface mining; and

In cases where the private mineral estate has been severed from the private surface estate, the applicant has submitted to the commissioner:

The written consent of the surface owner to the extraction of coal by surface mining methods;

A conveyance that expressly grants or reserves the right to extract the coal by surface mining methods; or

If the conveyance does not expressly grant the right to extract coal by surface mining methods, the surface-subsurface legal relationship shall be determined by law; provided, that nothing in this part shall be construed to authorize the commissioner to adjudicate property rights disputes.

Acts 1987, ch. 251, § 14.

59-8-411. Public notice and review — Appeal from commissioner's decision.
[See contingent amendment to subdivision (c)(2) and the Compiler’s Notes.]

The permit applicant shall publish an advertisement in a newspaper of general circulation in the locality of the proposed site, which describes the ownership, the exact location, and boundaries of the proposed site specifically enough that the proposed operation can be readily located by local residents, and the location of the place where the application is available for public inspection. Such advertisement shall be published at least once within thirty (30) days prior to the filing of an application with the commissioner and shall be in such form as shall be specified by regulation.

The permit applicant shall notify every legal or equitable owner of record if different than the applicant of all surface areas contiguous to any part of the permit area by certified mail within thirty (30) days prior to the filing of the application of the proposed coal surface mining operation.

The permit application shall contain proof of such notification.

Any person may have the right to see and review the entire application, except for information for which confidentiality is provided in this part or otherwise by law, and any person having an interest which is or may be adversely affected, or the officer or head of any federal, state, or local governmental agency or authority may file written objections to the application for a permit within thirty (30) days after the receipt of an application. Any written comments received shall be taken into consideration when the commissioner makes a determination on the application.

If the application is approved, the permit shall be issued. If the application is disapproved, specific reasons therefor must be set forth in the notification.

[Current version. See second version for contingent amendment and Compiler's Notes.]

Any person with an interest which is or may be adversely affected by any decision of the commissioner in granting, denying, or modifying any permit application may appeal to the Tennessee board of water quality, oil, and gas [See the Compiler's Notes] within thirty (30) days. Such hearing shall be held within sixty (60) days of filing of such appeal and the hearing shall otherwise be conducted as provided in [former] § 59-8-321(g) [repealed. See the Compiler's Notes].

[Contingent amendment. See the Compiler's Notes.]

Any person with an interest which is or may be adversely affected by any decision of the commissioner in granting, denying, or modifying any permit application may appeal to the board within thirty (30) days. Such hearing shall be held within sixty (60) days of filing of such appeal and the hearing shall otherwise be conducted as provided in [former] §59-8-321(g) [repealed. See the Compiler's Notes].

Acts 1987, ch. 251, § 15; 2018, ch. 839, § 8.

Compiler's Notes. Former §59-8-321, referred to in this section, concerning the former board of reclamation review, was repealed by Acts 1991, ch. 117, § 2(b). The duties of the former board of reclamation review were transferred to the former water quality control board created by §69-3-104, by Acts 1991, ch. 117, § 4. The former water quality control board, created by § 69-3-104, was terminated by Acts 2012, ch. 986, § 26, and its responsibilities were transferred to the Tennessee board of water quality, oil, and gas, created by § 69-3-104.

Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 44 provided that the governor shall take all action necessary to prepare and submit for approval all necessary requests for federal grant funding and applications for authorization to the appropriate federal authority to obtain exclusive jurisdiction over surface coal mining and reclamation operations and the maximum federal money available for those purposes in an expeditious manner.

Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 45 provided that the commissioner of environment and conservation shall notify the secretary of state and the executive secretary of the Tennessee code commission of the date this state has been approved to exercise primacy over the regulation of surface coal mining and reclamation operations within its territorial boundaries.

Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 47 provided that the act, which amended this section, shall take effect, including for purposes of rulemaking, upon the deposit of federal funds in the Coal Mining Protection Fund.

Amendments. The 2018 amendment substituted “board” for “Tennessee board of water quality, oil, and gas” in (c)(2).

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 47. [See Compiler's Notes.]

Cross-References. Confidentiality of public records, §10-7-504.

59-8-412. Performance standards.

Any permit issued under this part to conduct coal surface mining operations shall require the operator to meet all applicable performance standards of this part, any other environmental laws and regulations which relate to the operation and any other requirements that the commissioner shall promulgate.

Such performance standards referred to in subsection (a) include:

Quick and permanent soil stabilization must be achieved by planting of grasses, legumes and trees or shrubs, or any prescribed combination thereof;

Backfilling and grading must be performed timely to prevent the impoundment and contamination of water in pits;

Drainage from affected areas must be controlled so as to minimize concentration of suspended solids to waters of the state;

All acid producing material must be buried on the protected area; and

All highwalls exposed during the mining process other than previously existing highwalls must be eliminated; provided, however, that if a prior existing highwall is disturbed, the highwall must be eliminated to the extent of the new exposure.

Acts 1987, ch. 251, § 16.